Utah statutes.
79-2-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Conservation officer" is as defined in Section 23-13-2.

(2)  "Species protection" means an action to protect a plant or animal species identified as:

(a)  sensitive by the state; or

(b)  threatened or endangered under the Endangered Species Act of 1973, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.

(3)  "Volunteer" means a person who donates a service to the department or a division of the department without pay or other compensation.

